ja: フィルムタイプ: 110mm; 120mm; 16mm; 35mm; 48mm; 70mm; その他
pt-BR: Tipo de filme: 110 mm; 120 mm; 16 mm; 35 mm; 48 mm; 70 mm; Outro
en: Film type: 110 mm; 120 mm; 16 mm; 35 mm; 48mm; 70 mm; Other
da: Filmtype: 110 mm; 120 mm; 16 mm; 35 mm; 48 mm; 70 mm; Andet
de: Filmtyp: 110 mm; 120 mm; 16 mm; 35 mm; 48 mm; 70 mm; Sonstiges
sv: Filmtyp: 110 mm; 120 mm; 16 mm; 35 mm; 48 mm; 70 mm; Övrigt
fi: Filmityyppi: 110 mm; 120 mm; 16 mm; 35 mm; 48 mm; 70 mm; Muu
ro-RO: Tip film: 110 mm; 120 mm; 16 mm; 35 mm; 48 mm; 70 mm; Altele
fr: Type de film: 110 mm; 120 mm; 16 mm; 35 mm; 48 mm; 70 mm; Autre
pl: Typ filmu: 110 mm; 120 mm; 16 mm; 35 mm; 48mm; 70 mm; Inne
el: Τύπος φιλμ: 110 mm; 120 mm; 16 mm; 35 mm; 48 mm; 70 mm; Άλλο
vi: Loại phim: 110 mm; 120 mm; 16 mm; 35 mm; 48 mm; 70 mm; Khác
tr: Film Tipi: 110 mm; 120 mm; 16 mm; 35 mm; 48mm; 70 mm; Diğer
it: Tipo di pellicola: 110 mm; 120 mm; 16 mm; 35 mm; 48 mm; 70 mm; Altro
zh-TW: 底片類型: 110 毫米; 120 毫米; 16 毫米; 35 毫米; 48 毫米; 70 毫米; 其他
lt-LT: Juostelės tipas: 110 mm; 120 mm; 16 mm; 35 mm; 48 mm; 70 mm; Kita
hu: Film típusa: 110 mm; 120 mm; 16 mm; 35 mm; 48 mm; 70 mm; Egyéb
es: Tipo de película: 110 mm; 120 mm; 16 mm; 35 mm; 48 mm; 70 mm; Otros
nb: Filmtype: 110 mm; 120 mm; 16 mm; 35 mm; 48 mm; 70 mm; Annet
sk-SK: Typ filmu: 110 mm; 120 mm; 16 mm; 35 mm; 48 mm; 70 mm; Iné
bg-BG: Тип филм: 110 мм; 120 мм; 16 мм; 35 мм; 48 мм; 70 мм; Други
ko: 필름 유형: 110mm; 120mm; 16mm; 35mm; 48mm; 70mm; 기타
cs: Typ filmu: 110 mm; 120 mm; 16 mm; 35 mm; 48 mm; 70 mm; Jiné
pt-PT: Tipo de película: 110 mm; 120 mm; 16 mm; 35 mm; 48mm; 70 mm; Outro
hr-HR: Vrsta filma: 110 mm; 120 mm; 16 mm; 35 mm; 48 mm; 70 mm; Ostalo
sl-SI: Vrsta filma: 110 mm; 120 mm; 16 mm; 35 mm; 48 mm; 70 mm; Drugo
th: ประเภทภาพยนตร์: 110 มม.; 120 มม.; 16 มม.; 35 มม.; 48 มม.; 70 มม.; อื่นๆ
nl: Filmtype: 110 mm; 120 mm; 16 mm; 35 mm; 48 mm; 70 mm; Andere
zh-CN: 胶片类型: 110 毫米; 120 毫米; 16 毫米; 35 毫米; 48 毫米; 70 毫米; 其他
ru: Тип пленки: 110 мм; 120 мм; 16 мм; 35 мм; 48 мм; 70 мм; Другой